Rhode Island, session 2025, SB544.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-27-4.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-27 entitled "Motor
Vehicle Offenses" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-27-4.1. Eluding a law enforcement officer with a motor vehicle in a high speed
pursuit.
Any person who in an attempt to elude or flee from a police officer in an emergency police
vehicle in a high speed pursuit of the person, operates a motor vehicle at speeds greater than fifteen
(15) miles per hour over the speed limit, or who causes property damage only in excess of one
thousand dollars ($1,000) shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned for
not more than five (5) years at the adult correctional institutions (ACI), and/or be subject to a fine
of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000), but not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000),
and may have their license suspended for not less than one year, but not more than two (2) years,
may be subject to the forfeiture of the motor vehicle.:
(1) For the first conviction, may be subject to the following sanctions:
(i) Up to one year incarceration at the adult correction institutions (A.C.I.) and a fine of
five hundred dollars ($500) but not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(ii) License suspension of not less than ninety (90) days but not more than six (6) months
and forfeiture of the motor vehicle.
(2) For a second or subsequent conviction, the person shall:
(i) Be sentenced to two (2) years at the A.C.I., but not more than five (5) years;

(ii) Be fined a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000) but not more than five thousand dollars
($5,000);
(iii) Receive a license suspension of not less than one year but not more than five (5) years;
and
(iv) Forfeit the motor vehicle.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000495
========
LC000495 - Page 2 of 3